Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2124
Additional investments; qualification; when determined.

Whether any investment pursuant to section 44-2123 meets the applicable requirements thereof shall be determined before such investment is made by calculating the applicable investment limitations as though the investment had already been made, taking into account the then outstanding principal balance on all previous investments in debt obligations, and the value of all previous investments in equity securities as of the day they were made, net of any return of capital invested, not including dividends.

Laws 1991, LB 236, § 5.